Maine, session 132, LD989.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §453, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Exemption; amateur radio license holders. Notwithstanding subsection 2, a
registrant that is a holder of an amateur radio license issued by the Federal Communications
Commission may not be charged the annual administrative fee for a vanity registration
plate displaying the call sign of the amateur radio station. The registrant may be required
to show proof of a valid amateur radio license issued by the Federal Communications
Commission and shall comply with motor vehicle registration requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 2. Implementation during next regular update of software; contingent
effective date. The Secretary of State shall implement the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
29-A, section 453, subsection 4-A during the next regular update of the software used by
the Department of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Motor Vehicles. This Act does not take
effect until the software used by the Department of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Motor
Vehicles is updated and the Department of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Motor Vehicles
notifies the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Clerk of the House of
Representatives and the Revisor of Statutes that the software has been updated.
In no event may this Act take effect until 90 days after the adjournment of the
Legislature.